Utah statutes.
17C-3-401.   Agency to provide notice of hearings.
(1)  Each agency shall provide notice, as provided in this part, of each:
(a)  plan hearing; and
(b)  budget hearing.
(2)  The notice required under Subsection (1) for a plan hearing may be
combined with the notice required for a budget hearing if those two hearings
are combined under Section 17C-3-301.
